Utah, session 2026, HB244.
Section 1. Section 34-58-101 is enacted to read:58. Employment Rights Regarding Cooperation with Law Enforcement34-58-101. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Law enforcement agency" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-1-102.(2)"Law enforcement officer" means an individual:(a)who is an employee of a law enforcement agency; and(b)whose primary and principal duties consist of the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of criminal or immigration statutes or ordinances of the federal government, this state, or a political subdivision of this state.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 34-58-102 is enacted to read:34-58-102. Employment rights regarding cooperation with law enforcement.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), an employer may not:(a)request, require, or prohibit an employee or an applicant for employment from:(i)voluntarily cooperating with a law enforcement officer; or(ii) declining to voluntarily cooperate with a law enforcement officer, unless required by law; or(b)take adverse action, fail to hire, or otherwise penalize an employee or an applicant for employment for:(i)voluntarily cooperating with a law enforcement officer;(ii)declining to voluntarily cooperate with a law enforcement officer, unless required by law; or(iii)indicating that the employee or applicant intends to:(A)voluntarily cooperate with a law enforcement officer if requested to do so by a law enforcement officer; or(B)decline to voluntarily cooperate with a law enforcement officer if requested to do so by a law enforcement officer, unless required by law.(2)Subsection (1) does not prevent an employer from requiring an employee to protect, or agree to protect, a legal right held solely by the employer in the context of an employee's voluntary interaction with a law enforcement officer in the course and scope of the employee's employment.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 34-58-103 is enacted to read:34-58-103. Civil action for violation of chapter.(1)An employee or an applicant for employment who is injured by an employer's violation of Section 34-58-102 may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction.(2)An action brought under Subsection (1) may request relief including monetary damages, injunctive relief, and specific performance.

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.